Idaho, session 2026, H0866.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Constitutional Officers
the following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs
and expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. ATTORNEY GENERAL:
A. STATE LEGAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $26,021,900 $1,289,000 $27,310,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 364,500 28,300 392,800
Consumer Protection
Fund 350,200 153,000 503,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 274,100 2,400 276,500
Federal Grant
Fund 1,008,100 209,300 1,217,400
TOTAL $28,018,800 $1,682,000 $29,700,800
B. INTERNET CRIMES AGAINST CHILDREN:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,666,400 $327,400 $1,017,300 $3,011,100
Federal Grant
Fund 160,200 218,800 6,000 385,000
TOTAL $1,826,600 $546,200 $1,023,300 $3,396,100
C. SPECIAL LITIGATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $740,700 $740,700
DIVISIONTOTAL $29,845,400 $2,968,900 $1,023,300 $33,837,600
II. STATE CONTROLLER:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,468,300 $1,801,200 $3,269,500
Federal COVID-19 Relief
Fund 0 1,607,600 1,607,600
TOTAL $1,468,300 $3,408,800 $4,877,100
B. STATEWIDE ACCOUNTING:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,838,300 $363,100 $2,201,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 5,000 5,000
TOTAL $1,838,300 $368,100 $2,206,400
C. COMPUTER CENTER:
FROM:
Data Processing Services
Fund $6,217,300 $8,349,600 $62,800 $14,629,700
D. ENTERPRISE BUSINESS OPERATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $5,742,800 $12,105,200 $17,848,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 5,000 5,000
TOTAL $5,742,800 $12,110,200 $17,853,000
DIVISIONTOTAL $15,266,700 $24,236,700 $62,800 $39,566,200
III. EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR:
A. ADMINISTRATION - GOVERNOR'S OFFICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,317,100 $327,700 $2,644,800
B. ACTING GOVERNOR PAY:
FROM:
General
Fund $17,800 $17,800
C. EXPENSE ALLOWANCE:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,900 $4,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
D. GOVERNOR'S EMERGENCY:
FROM:
Governor's Emergency
Fund $2,000,000 $2,000,000
DIVISIONTOTAL $2,334,900 $2,332,600 $4,667,500
IV. LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR:
FROM:
General
Fund $270,100 $32,400 $302,500
V. SECRETARY OF STATE:
A. SECRETARY OF STATE:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,692,300 $1,883,800 $5,576,100
B. COMMISSION ON UNIFORM STATE LAWS:
FROM:
General
Fund $60,500 $60,500
DIVISIONTOTAL $3,692,300 $1,944,300 $5,636,600
VI. STATE TREASURER:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,151,500 $489,300 $1,640,800
State Treasurer LGIP
Fund 224,100 140,700 364,800
Treasurer's Office - Professional Services
Fund 1,009,500 623,600 1,633,100
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 80,000 80,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Abandoned Property Trust - Unclaimed Property
Fund 1,223,500 515,500 1,739,000
TOTAL $3,608,600 $1,849,100 $5,457,700
GRANDTOTAL $55,018,000 $33,364,000 $62,800 $1,023,300 $89,468,100
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In accordance with Section 67-3519,
Idaho Code, each of the programs listed below in Constitutional Officers is
authorized no more than the following number of full-time equivalent posi-
tions at any point during the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027,
unless specifically authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Appro-
priations Committee will be notified promptly of any increased positions so
authorized:
Executive Office of the Governor ...............................17.00
Office of the Lieutenant Governor ...............................3.00
Office of the Attorney General ................................227.40
Office of the State Controller ................................125.00
Office of the Secretary of State ...............................35.50
Office of the State Treasurer ..................................30.00
SECTION 3. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS AND PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITA-
TIONS -- EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR. For fiscal year 2027, the Execu-
tive Office of the Governor is hereby exempted from the provisions of Section
67-3511 (1), (2), and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers between
expense classes and between programs, for all moneys appropriated to it for
the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. Legislative appropriations
shall not be transferred from one fund to another fund unless expressly ap-
proved by the Legislature.
SECTION 4. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS TRANSFER LIMITATIONS -- OF-
FICE OF THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR. For fiscal year 2027, the Office of the
Lieutenant Governor is hereby exempted from the provisions of Section
67-3511 (1) and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers between ex-
pense classes, for all moneys appropriated to it for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027. Legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 5. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS AND PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITA-
TIONS -- OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL. The Office of the Attorney General
is hereby exempted from the provisions of Section 67-3511 (1), (2), and
(3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers between expense classes and
between programs, for all moneys appropriated to it for the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. Legislative appropriations shall not be


transferred from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the
Legislature.
SECTION 6. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY -- OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF
STATE. There is hereby reappropriated to the Office of the Secretary of State
any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to
the Office of the Secretary of State for election integrity audits and elec-
tions system upgrades for fiscal year 2026 to be used for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office of the State Controller shall con-
firm the reappropriation amounts, by fund, expense class, and program, with
the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation
authorized herein.
SECTION 7. INDIRECT COST RECOVERY -- OFFICE OF THE STATE CONTROLLER.
The moneys assessed by the Division of Financial Management in accordance
with Section 67-3531, Idaho Code, for the Office of the State Controller ser-
vices shall be placed in the Indirect Cost Recovery Fund. On June 30, 2027,
the State Controller shall transfer the amount assessed in the statewide
cost allocation plan from the Indirect Cost Recovery Fund to the state Gen-
eral Fund.
SECTION 8. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE DATA PROCESSING SERVICES
FUND -- OFFICE OF THE STATE CONTROLLER. There is hereby reappropriated to the
Office of the State Controller any unexpended and unencumbered balances ap-
propriated or reappropriated to the Office of the State Controller from the
Data Processing Services Fund for fiscal year 2026 in an amount not to exceed
$2,500,000 to be used for nonrecurring expenditures related to the Computer
Service Center for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office
of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund,
expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to
processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 9. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE GENERAL FUND -- OFFICE OF
THE STATE CONTROLLER. There is hereby reappropriated to the Office of the
State Controller any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or
reappropriated to the Office of the State Controller from the General Fund
for the behavioral health reporting data system for fiscal year 2026, to be
used for nonrecurring expenditures related to the behavioral health report-
ing data system for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Of-
fice of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by
fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior
to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 10. CASH TRANSFER -- OFFICE OF THE STATE CONTROLLER. The Office
of the State Controller is hereby directed to transfer unencumbered cash
balances from each allocated fund of the Technology Infrastructure Stabi-
lization Fund to the control agency account. Authorized appropriations
beginning on July 1, 2026, shall be transferred by the Office of the State
Controller from the control agency account; any unencumbered funds will


revert back to the control agency account as soon as practicable at the end
of the fiscal year.
SECTION 11. CASH BALANCE RECONCILIATION -- OFFICE OF THE STATE CON-
TROLLER. The Office of the State Controller shall use an appropriate amount
of moneys appropriated to such office in Section 1 of this act to complete an
accurate cash account balance and activity reconciliation by fund as fol-
lows:
(1) The Office of the State Controller shall reconcile all cash account
balances and activity in Luma to cash account balances and activity
maintained in the Treasury Accounting Transaction Reporting System
(TATRS), as reconciled to bank statements, for the month beginning July
1, 2023, and each consecutive month thereafter, through June 30, 2026.
This cash reconciliation shall occur for each fund and agency, includ-
ing the control agency.
(2) The Office of the State Controller shall report its findings on the
accuracy of cash balances after reconciliation as of June 30, 2026, to
the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee (JFAC) and the Legislative
Services Office. Such report shall be made at the fall interim meeting
of JFAC or by October 16, 2026, whichever is earlier.
(3) The Office of the State Controller shall maintain all documenta-
tion to support these cash reconciliations by fund and agency reported
in Luma and TATRS and provide that documentation as necessary for audit
to support the opinion on the Annual Comprehensive Financial Report for
the state.
SECTION 12. PAYMENT OF BANK SERVICE FEES -- STATE TREASURER. Of the
amount appropriated to the State Treasurer in Section 1 of this act, no more
than $406,600 from the General Fund and $221,700 from the Professional Ser-
vices Fund may be used for the payment of bank service fees for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 13. CONTINUOUS APPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE AMERICA250 COM-
MEMORATION FUND -- STATE TREASURER. The State Treasurer is hereby granted
continuous appropriation authority for the America250 Commemoration Fund
for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. Gifts, grants, other
donations, and interest earned and retained by the fund is continuously ap-
propriated for the purpose provided in Section 57-832, Idaho Code.
SECTION 14. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 15. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.